Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5953.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 407. (1) Subject to subsection (4), an eligible individual who makes a claim for benefits against the eligible individual's employer for work-related post-traumatic stress disorder shall suspend the claim and may make a claim for like benefits from the post-traumatic stress injury fund if the eligible individual meets both of the following conditions: (a) Experiences a qualifying traumatic event on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section in the course of the eligible individual's employment in an occupation described in subsection (9)(a)(i). (b) Is diagnosed after the qualifying traumatic event with post-traumatic stress disorder by a mental health professional. (2) If an eligible individual makes a claim against the fund under subsection (1), except as otherwise provided under subsection (3), the post-traumatic stress disorder is presumed to arise out of and in the course of employment. (3) The presumption under subsection (2) may be rebutted by clear and convincing medical evidence that 1 of the following applies: (a) The eligible individual's post-traumatic stress disorder was primarily caused by non-work-related factors. (b) The diagnosis does not meet the diagnostic criteria of the most current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders. (4) As a condition precedent to filing an application for like benefits under subsection (1), an eligible individual must first apply for and do all things necessary to qualify for any pension benefits to which the eligible individual, or the eligible individual's decedent, may be entitled or must demonstrate that the eligible individual or the eligible individual's decedent is ineligible for any pension benefits. If a final determination is made that pension benefits will not be awarded or that the eligible individual or the eligible individual's decedent is ineligible for any pension benefits, then the presumption under subsection (2) applies. The employer or eligible individual may request 2 copies of the determination denying pension benefits, 1 copy of which must be filed with the agency on request. (5) If an eligible individual described in subsection (1) is eligible for any pension benefits, that eligibility does not prohibit the eligible individual or dependents of that eligible individual from receiving benefits under section 315 for the medical expenses or portion of medical expenses that are not provided for by the pension program. (6) An eligible individual's suspension of a claim under subsection (1) is in effect only during the period the eligible individual receives like benefits from the fund. If a redemption agreement between the fund and the eligible individual is approved, the suspension of a claim against the eligible individual's employer under subsection (1) continues indefinitely. (7) If an application for a hearing filed with the agency concerns post-traumatic stress disorder, a hearing must be held not later than 90 days after the application is received, and, except for a hearing that concerns a case described under section 205, must take precedence over all other hearings. (8) The director shall develop the application, approval, and compliance process necessary to operate and manage the fund. The director shall develop and implement the use of an application form to be used by a claimant for benefits payable by the fund under subsection (1). When a claim under subsection (1) is received, the director shall notify the employer against whom a claim is suspended or the carrier. The employer or carrier may access all information the agency receives with respect to the claim and may request that the agency obtain specific additional information. The fund standards, guidelines, and templates, and any other forms used by the director to implement the fund must be posted and maintained on the department's website. The director shall review and consider claims in the order in which they are received and shall approve or deny a claim not later than 30 days after receipt of the claim. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Eligible individual" means an individual who meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is or was at the time the individual experienced a qualifying traumatic event 1 of the following: (A) A full-time, part-time, paid on-call, or volunteer member of a fire or police department of a city, township, or incorporated village. (B) A full-time, part-time, paid on-call, or volunteer member of a public fire authority. (C) A county sheriff or a full-time, part-time, paid on-call, or volunteer deputy of the county sheriff. (D) A full-time, part-time, paid on-call, or volunteer member of the state police. (E) A full-time, part-time, paid on-call, or volunteer member of a fire department of an airport operated by a county, public airport authority, or state university or college. (F) An individual who holds a license under section 20950 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20950. (G) A state correctional officer as that term is defined in section 2 of the correctional officers' training act of 1982, 1982 PA 415, MCL 791.502. (H) A 911-dispatcher or call taker. (ii) Has 5 or more years of cumulative service in an occupation described in subparagraph (i). (iii) If the individual is retired from an occupation described in subparagraph (i), has been retired for fewer than 10 years. (iv) Files a claim not later than 180 days after learning of the post-traumatic disorder diagnosis and its relationship to the individual's employment. (b) "Fund" means the post-traumatic stress injury fund created under section 409. (c) "Mental health professional" includes all of the following: (i) A doctoral level psychologist licensed under section 18223(1) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18223. (ii) A psychologist who is licensed or otherwise authorized to engage in the practice of psychology under part 182 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18201 to 333.18237. (iii) A licensed master's social worker as that term is defined in section 18501 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18501. (iv) A licensed professional counselor as that term is defined in section 18101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18101. (v) Any other practitioner licensed in this state with a master's degree or higher who is qualified under state law to diagnose post-traumatic stress disorder. (d) "Post-traumatic stress disorder" means a mental disorder that meets diagnostic criteria for post-traumatic stress disorder under the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders. (e) "Qualifying traumatic event" means a high-stress situation that may lead to psychological trauma. Qualifying traumatic event includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) Witnessing or responding to another individual's serious bodily injury or death. (ii) Receiving immediate threats to life or safety. (iii) Witnessing or responding to a mass casualty incident. (iv) Responding to or investigating crime scenes. (f) Qualifying traumatic event does not include any of the following: (i) Disciplinary actions. (ii) Personnel or performance evaluations. (iii) Job transfers, layoffs, demotions, or terminations. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06746'26) or House Bill No. 5952 (request no. H06746'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.